Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 7. Absentee Voting.
§ 24.2-701.2.
Absentee voting in person; voter satellite offices.

The governing body of any county or city may establish, by ordinance, voter satellite offices to be used in the locality for absentee voting in person. The governing body may establish as many offices as it deems necessary. No change in, including the creation or abolishment of, any voter satellite office shall be enacted within 60 days next preceding any general election. Notice shall be published prior to enactment in a newspaper having general circulation in the locality once a week for two successive weeks.

Any voter satellite office shall be in a public building owned or leased by the county, city, or town within the county and may be in a facility that is owned or leased by the Commonwealth and used as a location for Department of Motor Vehicles facilities or as an office of the general registrar. Such location shall be deemed the equivalent of the office of the general registrar for the purposes of completing the application for an absentee ballot in person pursuant to §§

24.2-701

and

24.2-706

. Any such location shall have adequate facilities for the protection of all elections materials produced in the process of absentee voting in person, the voted and unvoted absentee ballots, and any voting systems in use at the location.

Voter satellite offices shall be accessible to qualified voters as required by the provisions of the Virginians with Disabilities Act (§

51.5-1

et seq.), the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act (52 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.), and the Americans with Disabilities Act relating to public services (42 U.S.C. § 12131 et seq.). The State Board shall provide instructions to the local electoral boards and general registrars to assist the localities in complying with the requirements of the acts.

The governing body of each county, city, and town shall provide funds to enable the general registrar to provide adequate facilities at each voter satellite office for the conduct of elections.

Not later than 55 days prior to any election, the general registrar shall post notice of all voter satellite office locations in the locality and the dates and hours of operation of each location in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city. Such notice shall remain in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city for the duration of the period during which absentee voting in person is available. If the county or city does not have an official website, such notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city at least once prior to the election but not later than 55 days prior to such election.

If an emergency makes a voter satellite office unusable or inaccessible, the electoral board or the general registrar shall provide an alternative voter satellite office, subject to the approval of the State Board, and shall give notice of the change in the location of the voter satellite office. The general registrar shall provide notice to the voters appropriate to the circumstances of the emergency. For the purposes of this subsection, “emergency” means a rare and unforeseen combination of circumstances, or the resulting state, that calls for immediate action.

The provisions of subsection E of §

24.2-310

providing certain limited circumstances in which a local electoral board may approve an exception to the prohibition on the distribution of campaign materials inside the prohibited area outside of a polling place shall apply to voter satellite offices and the building in which such offices may be located.

A voter satellite office established pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be the equivalent of an office of the general registrar for purposes of completing an application for an absentee ballot in person pursuant to §§

24.2-701

,

24.2-701

.1, and

24.2-706

.

History.

2020, cc. 856, 1149, 1151, 1201.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 856, deleted subsection C of §

24.2-701.1

and incorporated it into this section. Acts 2020, cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 added a sentence to subsection C of §

24.2-701.1

, which was added as the second sentence in subsection B of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2020, c. 856, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of §

24.2-701.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.”

§ 24.2-702.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 313, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-702

was also amended by Acts 2015, cc. 644 and 645, cl. 1.

Former §

24.2-702

, pertaining to application for early absentee ballot, derived from 1992, c. 291, § 24.1-228.1:2; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-702.1.
Federal write-in absentee ballots.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

, may use a federal write-in absentee ballot in any election. Such ballot shall be submitted and processed in the manner provided by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.) and this article.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a federal write-in absentee ballot submitted pursuant to subsection A shall be considered valid for purposes of simultaneously satisfying both an absentee ballot application and a completed absentee ballot, provided that the ballot is received no later than the deadline for the return of absentee ballots as provided in §

24.2-709

for the election in which the voter offers to vote, and the application contains the following information: (i) the voter’s signature; however, if the voter is unable to sign, the person assisting the voter will note this fact in the voter signature box; (ii) the voter’s printed name; (iii) the county or city in which he is registered and offers to vote; (iv) the residence address at which he is registered to vote; (v) his current military or overseas address; and (vi) the signature of a witness who shall sign the same application.

This section shall not be construed to require that an absentee ballot be sent to the absentee voter on receipt of a federal write-in absentee ballot unless the voter has also submitted an absentee ballot application pursuant to §

24.2-701

.

History.

1993, c. 813, § 24.1-228.2:1; 1993, c. 641; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2009, cc. 230, 310; 2010, cc. 449, 645; 2011, cc. 427, 458; 2012, c. 353; 2015, c. 313; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 1149, 1151, 1201.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 813 enacted former § 24.1-228.2:1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given to this section, as set out above.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are almost identical, and inserted the subsection A designation; and inserted subsection B. In addition, in clause (i) of subsection B, c. 819 inserts “the voter is” preceding “unable to sign.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 230 and 310 are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “no later than the deadline for the return of absentee ballots as provided in § 24.7-709 for” for “not less than five days prior to,” added clause (vi) and made related changes, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The envelop must be witnessed, and the witness shall provide his signature, printed name and address in the witness signature box” and added the present last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and deleted “federal” preceding “write-in” throughout; in subsection A, substituted “any election” for “general, special, and primary elections for federal office”; and in subsection B, deleted “for federal offices only” following “completed absentee ballot.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 427 and 458 are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “on the envelope” following the second occurrence of “application” and substituted “sign the same application” for “sign the same envelope,” and in the last sentence, added “but such registration shall be valid only for the election for which the write-in ballot was sent”; and added subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 353 inserted “federal” preceding “write-in absentee ballot” throughout the section; and in subsection B, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “If the voter is not currently registered in Virginia and is eligible to be, such write-in absentee ballot shall also be considered valid for the purpose of serving as a voter registration application, but such registration shall be valid only for the election for which the write-in ballot was sent.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 313, in subsection C, deleted “24.2-702” following “24.2-701,” and made related stylistic changes..

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” for “subdivision 2 of §

24.2-700

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149 and 1151 are identical, and substituted “covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “qualified absentee voter who is eligible for an absentee ballot under subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” in subsection A.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1201, in subsection A, substituted “covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “qualified absentee voter who is eligible for an absentee ballot under subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” in the first sentence; and deleted “or

24.2-703

” at the end of C.

§ 24.2-703.
Application for absentee ballots for multiple elections for uniformed and overseas voters.

Any person who is eligible for a military-overseas ballot as defined in §

24.2-452

may file a single application to receive ballots for all elections in which he is eligible to vote absentee. The application shall be on a federal postcard application. An application from any person who is already registered or who is eligible for late registration under §

24.2-419

that is received by the general registrar no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day prior to the election shall be considered a standing request for absentee ballots through December 31 of the year following the calendar year of the date of the application or another shorter period the voter specifies. In the event that a second or subsequent federal postcard application is received from a voter, any previous applications shall be superseded and the duration of the most recently received application shall apply.

The general registrar shall retain the application and process the applicant’s request for an absentee ballot for each election in accordance with procedures established by the State Board. The applicant shall specify by party designation the primary ballots he is requesting.

If an official reply to the application or an absentee ballot sent to the applicant is returned as undeliverable, no other ballots shall be sent. No ballot shall be sent to the applicant, and no voted ballot received from the applicant shall be valid, (i) for any election held after the voter has notified the registrar that the voter no longer wishes to be registered or (ii) after the registrar has received notification that the voter has registered to vote in another state.

History.

1991, c. 603, § 24.1-228.1:1; 1993, c. 641; 2001, c. 793; 2004, c. 410; 2006, c. 438; 2010, cc. 449, 645; 2011, cc. 427, 458; 2012, c. 353; 2020, c. 289.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 793, in the first paragraph, substituted “accepted the later of (i) twelve months before an election, or (ii) the day following any election held in the twelfth month prior to the election in which the applicant is applying to vote,” for “filed at any time during the calendar year” near the beginning of the third sentence, and added the last sentence in the paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, rewrote the first paragraph and in the last paragraph, deleted “during the calendar year” at the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 438, in the third sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “shall be valid for any election conducted five or more days after receipt of the application” and added “that is received” before “by the general registrar” and “no later than 5:00 p.m. on the seventh day prior to the election shall be valid” after this phrase.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and in the first paragraph, deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 4” twice, substituted “end of the federal election cycle in which the voter submits the application or for 365 days, whichever is longer” for “next two regularly scheduled general elections for federal office following its receipt” in the third sentence and for “next two regularly scheduled general elections for federal office following the receipt of the application by the general registrar” in the last sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 427 and 458 are identical, and in the first paragraph, in the first and fourth sentences, twice substituted “Article” for “Articles,” in the third and fourth sentences, substituted “shall be valid through either the next November general election or federal general election, whichever is later” for “shall be valid through the end of the federal election cycle in which the voter submits the application or for 365 days, whichever is longer,” and added the last sentence; and in the first sentence in the last paragraph, substituted “no other ballots” for “no ballots for subsequent elections.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 353 rewrote the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 289, substituted “eleventh day” for “seventh day” in the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

§ 24.2-703.1.
Permanent absentee voter list.

Any registered voter shall be eligible to file a special application to receive absentee ballots for all elections in which he is eligible to vote. Such application shall be on a form approved by the State Board. The absentee ballots sent to a voter on the permanent absentee voter list shall be sent to the address in the voter’s registration record, except as provided in subdivision C 1.

In accordance with procedures established by the State Board, the general registrar shall retain the application, enroll the applicant on a permanent absentee voter list, and process the applicant’s request for an absentee ballot for each succeeding election. The applicant shall specify by party designation the primary ballots he is requesting.

The State Board shall prescribe the process by which a voter on the permanent absentee voter list may:

Request that his absentee ballot for (i) a single election or (ii) a primary election and the following general election be sent to an address other than the address on his voter registration record.

Request a primary ballot for a political party other than the one he specified on his application for permanent absentee voter status for a single primary election.

Change his political party selection for all succeeding primary elections.

A voter shall be removed from the permanent absentee voter list if (i) the voter requests in writing to be removed from the list, (ii) the voter’s registration is canceled pursuant to §

24.2-427

, (iii) the voter’s registration is placed on inactive status pursuant to §

24.2-428

or

24.2-428.1

, or (iv) the voter moves to a different address not in the same county or city of his registration.

History.

2001, cc. 789, 850; 2008, c 880; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 1156, 1201.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 789 and 850, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall monitor implementation of the provisions of this act and, annually beginning July 1, 2002, shall report to the General Assembly and the Governor the number of individuals benefiting from this absentee ballot procedure in each locality as well as any abuses of the procedure.”

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

Acts 2020, cc. 1149 and 1151 also amended this section. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, they were not given effect in this section.

Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §

24.2-703.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021,
Sp. Sess. I, ch. 471, cl. 2, § 1 provides: “That the Department of Elections shall enroll on the permanent absentee voter list pursuant to §

24.2-703.1

of the Code of Virginia, as it shall become effective, each voter enrolled, on or before June 30, 2021, on the special absentee voter applicant list pursuant to §

24.2-703.1

of the Code of Virginia, as it is currently effective, without any action necessary on the voter’s part, unless the voter opts out of enrollment on the permanent absentee voter list. On or before July 1, 2021, the Department of Elections shall provide the means for a voter to opt out of being enrolled on the permanent absentee voter list. On or before July 1, 2021, the general registrars shall notify each voter enrolled on the special absentee voter applicant list that the voter will be enrolled on the permanent absentee voter list unless the voter so declines and shall provide instructions on how to do so.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880, in the first paragraph, deleted “physical” preceding “disability” and “illness” near the beginning and substituted “eligible” for “disabled or ill”
in the first sentence; and inserted “provider as defined in §

37.2-403

,” deleted “because of a physical disability or physical illness” preceding “and likely to remain so” and substituted “eligible” for “disabled or ill”
in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and substituted “subdivision A 4 of §

24.2-700

” for “subdivision 4 of §

24.2-700

” twice.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1201, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 24.2-703.2.
Replacement absentee ballots for certain disabled or ill voters; penalty.

A person with a disability or illness who has applied for and has been sent an absentee ballot who did not receive or has lost the absentee ballot on or before the Saturday before the election may obtain a replacement absentee ballot. In such case, the voter may request a replacement absentee ballot by the close of business for the local elections office on the Saturday before election day and designate, in writing, a representative to obtain a replacement absentee ballot on his behalf from the general registrar and to return the properly completed ballot as directed by the general registrar no later than the close of polls on the day of election for which the absentee ballot is valid. The representative shall be age 18 or older and shall not be an elected official, a candidate for elected office, or the deputy, spouse, parent, or child of an elected official or candidate. The voter and representative shall complete the form prescribed by the State Board to implement the provisions of this section. The form shall include a statement signed by the voter that he did not receive the ballot or has lost the ballot. Statements on the form shall be subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

.

History.

2002, cc. 23, 141; 2008, c. 880; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 1149, 1151, 1201.

Cross references.

As to punishment for felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880 deleted “physical” preceding “disability” and “illness” in clause (i).

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and deleted “electoral board or” preceding “general registrar” both times it appears in the second sentence.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and substituted “subdivision A 4 of §

24.2-700

” for “subdivision 4 of §

24.2-700

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “A voter seeking to cast an absentee ballot may obtain a replacement absentee ballot subject to the following conditions: (i) the voter applied for an absentee ballot under subdivision A 4 of §

24.2-700

because of a disability or illness; (ii) the application was approved and an absentee ballot mailed to the voter; and (iii) the voter did not receive or has lost the absentee ballot on or before the Saturday before the election”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 24.2-704.
Applications and ballots for persons requiring assistance in voting; penalty.

The application for an absentee ballot shall provide space for the applicant to indicate that he will require assistance to vote his absentee ballot by reason of blindness, disability, or inability to read or write.

On receipt of an application from an applicant who indicated that he will require assistance due to a visual impairment or print disability, the general registrar shall offer to provide to the applicant a ballot marking tool with screen reader assistive technology made available pursuant to §

24.2-103.2

. If the applicant opts to use such tool, the general registrar shall send by mail to him a ballot return envelope and accessible instructions provided by the Department for using such tool and returning the marked ballot. The general registrar shall cause the outer envelope containing the ballot return envelope and accessible instructions to have a tactile marking that identifies the outer envelope as the outer envelope to the voter. For purposes of this section, “tactile marking” includes a hole punch, a cut corner, or a tactile sticker.An absentee voter using such tool shall return the marked absentee ballot in accordance with the instructions provided by the Department.No ballot marked with the electronic ballot marking tool shall be rejected because the ballot was printed on regular paper. No ballot marked with the electronic ballot marking tool shall be rejected on the basis of the position of the voter’s signature or address on the ballot return envelope as long as the voter’s signature or address is anywhere on the ballot return envelope.

On receipt of an application from an applicant marked to indicate that he will require assistance due to any other disability or if an applicant offered the ballot marking tool pursuant to subsection B declines to use such tool, the general registrar shall deliver, with the items required by §

24.2-706

, the voter assistance form furnished by the State Board pursuant to §

24.2-649

. The voter and any person assisting him shall complete the form by signing the request for assistance and statement required of the assistant. If the voter is unable to sign the request, the witness will note this fact on the line for signature of voter. The provisions of §

24.2-649

shall apply to absentee voting and assistance for absentee voters. Any person who willfully violates the provisions of this section or §

24.2-649

in providing assistance to a person who is voting absentee shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

1984, c. 775, § 24.1-228.2; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 295; 2006, c. 242; 2008, c. 880; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 255, 471, 522.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 242 added the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880 deleted “physical” preceding “disability” in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 255, 471 and 522, effective July 1, 2021, are nearly identical, and added the subsection A and C designations; added subsection B; and in subsection C, inserted “that” and “due to any other disability or if an applicant offered the ballot marking tool pursuant to subsection B declines to use such tool” in the first sentence.

§ 24.2-705.
Emergency applications and absentee ballots for individual emergencies.

Any person registered and otherwise qualified to vote may request at any time prior to 2:00 p.m. on the day preceding the election that he be permitted to vote by emergency absentee ballot with the assistance of his designated representative. The Department shall prescribe a form and the instructions for submitting such a request to the general registrar that shows that the voter requesting an emergency absentee ballot (i) was unable to apply for an absentee ballot by the deadline due to his hospitalization or illness, or the hospitalization, illness, or death of a spouse, child, or parent, or other emergency found to justify receipt of an emergency absentee ballot or (ii) will be unable to vote on election day due to his hospitalization or illness, the hospitalization, illness, or death of a spouse, child, or parent, or other emergency found to justify receipt of an emergency absentee ballot that occurred after the deadline for applying for an absentee ballot.The representative designated by a voter for purposes of this subsection shall be age 18 or older and shall not be an elected official, a candidate for elected office, or the deputy, spouse, parent, or child of an elected official or candidate.The requesting voter shall sign the form and state, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that to the best of his knowledge and belief the facts contained in the form are true and correct. His signature shall be witnessed by the designated representative, who shall sign and return the completed form to the office of the general registrar no later than 5:00 p.m. on the day preceding the election. If the requesting voter is blind or physically unable to sign the form, his designated representative shall write on the signature line that the voter is blind or unable to sign his form.On receipt of the completed form and a determination of the qualification of the requesting voter to vote, the general registrar shall provide, in accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter, an absentee ballot to the designated representative for delivery to the requesting voter.The requesting voter shall vote the absentee ballot as provided by law and mark it in the presence of the designated representative. The designated representative shall complete a statement, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that (i) he is the designated representative of the requesting voter; (ii) he personally delivered the ballot to the voter who applied for it; (iii) in his presence, the voter marked the ballot, the ballot was placed in the envelope provided, the envelope was sealed, and the statement on its reverse side was signed by the requesting voter; and (iv) the ballot was returned, under seal, to the general registrar at the registrar’s office.The ballot shall be counted only if the ballot is received by the general registrar prior to the close of polls, and the general registrar shall deliver the ballot to the officers of election at each appropriate precinct pursuant to §

24.2-710

.

A qualified voter may vote absentee in person in the office of the general registrar through 2:00 p.m. on the day immediately preceding the election by complying with the requirements of §

24.2-643

and affirming that one of the following emergency circumstances will prevent him from voting on election day:

After 12:00 p.m. on the Saturday before the election, an obligation arose that requires the voter be absent from his county or city on election day for (i) his business, profession, or occupation; (ii) the hospitalization of the voter or a member of his immediate family; or (iii) the death of a member of his immediate family. For purposes of this subdivision, “immediate family” means the child, grandchild, parent, grandparent, legal guardian, sibling, or spouse of the voter.

The voter is an officer of election who was assigned after 12:00 p.m. on the Saturday before the election to work in a precinct other than his own on election day.

The Commissioner of Elections may act administratively to facilitate absentee voting by qualified voters who are emergency workers or utility workers or who otherwise respond to and offer assistance to an area in which a state of emergency has been declared by an appropriate authority. These administrative actions may include central issuance and acceptance of absentee ballots for federal and state elections using the systems and procedures developed for voters who are members of a uniformed service.

History.

1989, c. 192, § 24.1-229.1; 1990, c. 200; 1993, cc. 420, 641; 1996, c. 224; 1997, cc. 523, 539; 1999, c. 590; 2001, c. 622; 2006, c. 297; 2008, c. 880; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2020, cc. 289, 1157, 1163; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 471.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 420 amended former § 24.1-229.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1993, c. 420.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “seventh day” for “fifth day” throughout the section.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 622 substituted “2:00 p.m.” for “noon” in two places in the first paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 297 substituted the language beginning “prior to the close of polls” for “(i) prior to noon on the day of the election in any county, city, or town which does not have a central absentee voter election district or (ii) prior to the closing of the polls in any county, city, or town which has a central absentee voter precinct” in the last paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880 inserted “or

37.2-100

” in the last sentence in the first paragraph; and in the fourth paragraph, deleted “or” following “hospital administration” near the beginning and inserted “or provider as defined by §

37.2-403

” near the middle of the first sentence and inserted “provider as defined by §

37.2-403

” in the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” everywhere it appears in the first, second sixth and seventh paragraphs; substituted “as determined by the general registrar, the general registrar shall” for “as determined by the electoral board, the secretary of the electoral board shall” in the fourth sentence of the fourth paragraph; and deleted “or secretary of the electoral board” following “the general registrar” in the fifth paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 289, substituted “eleventh day” for “seventh day” throughout.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1157, rewrote subsection A and added subsections B and C.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1163, deleted “in the District of Columbia or any state contiguous to Virginia” in the first paragraph, last sentence at the end.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted the clause (i) designation, and added clause (ii).

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

§§ 24.2-705.1,
24.2-705.2.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 1157, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-705.1

, pertaining to late applications and in-person absentee voting for business and medical emergencies, derived from 1997, c. 464; 2001, c. 622; 2008, c. 880; 2010, c. 539.

Former § 24.2-705.2, pertaining to late applications and in-person absentee voting for certain officers of election, derived from Acts 2001, c. 622.

Acts 2020, cc. 1149, 1151, 1163, 1201 amended the sections.